Indiana, session 2026, HB1105.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-5.5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.26-2022,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) For purposes of this section, "party"
includes:
(1) a seller of property that is exempt under the seller's ownership;
or
(2) a purchaser of property that is exempt under the purchaser's
ownership;
from property taxes under IC 6-1.1-10.
(b) Subject to subsections (g) and (h), (h) and (i), before filing a
conveyance document with the county auditor under IC 6-1.1-5-4, all
the parties to the conveyance must do the following:
(1) Complete and sign a sales disclosure form as prescribed by the
department of local government finance under section 5 of this
chapter. All the parties may sign one (1) form, or if all the parties
do not agree on the information to be included on the completed
form, each party may sign and file a separate form. For
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


conveyance transactions involving more than two (2) parties, one
(1) transferor and one (1) transferee signing the sales disclosure
form is sufficient.
(2) Before filing a sales disclosure form with the county auditor,
submit the sales disclosure form to the county assessor. The
county assessor must review the accuracy and completeness of
each sales disclosure form submitted immediately upon receipt of
the form and, if the form is accurate and complete, stamp or
otherwise approve the form as eligible for filing with the county
auditor and return the form to the appropriate party for filing with
the county auditor. If multiple forms are filed in a short period,
the county assessor shall process the forms as quickly as possible.
For purposes of this subdivision, a sales disclosure form is
considered to be accurate and complete if:
(A) the county assessor does not have substantial evidence
when the form is reviewed under this subdivision that
information in the form is inaccurate; and
(B) both of the following conditions are satisfied:
(i) The form contains the information required by section
5(a)(1) through 5(a)(16) 5(a)(17) of this chapter as that
section applies to the conveyance transaction, subject to the
obligation of a party to furnish or correct that information in
the manner required by and subject to the penalty provisions
of section 12 of this chapter. The form may not be rejected
for failure to contain information other than that required by
section 5(a)(1) through 5(a)(16) 5(a)(17) of this chapter.
(ii) The form is submitted to the county assessor in a format
usable to the county assessor.
(3) File the sales disclosure form with the county auditor.
(4) After December 31, 2023, a county assessor or county auditor
may not refuse to accept a sales disclosure form for filing because
the sales disclosure form is an electronic document.
(c) The auditor shall review each sales disclosure form and process
any deduction for which the form serves as an application under
IC 6-1.1-12-44. The auditor shall forward each sales disclosure form
to the county assessor. The county assessor shall verify the assessed
valuation of the property for the assessment date to which the
application applies and transmit that assessed valuation to the auditor.
The county assessor shall retain the forms for five (5) years. The county
assessor shall forward the sales disclosure form data to the department
of local government finance in an electronic format specified by the
department of local government finance on or before April 1 in a year
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


ending before January 1, 2016, and on or before February 1 in a year
beginning after December 31, 2015. The county assessor shall forward
a copy of the sales disclosure forms to the township assessors in the
county. The department of local government finance shall make sales
disclosure form data received from a county assessor available to the
legislative services agency. The forms may be used by the county
assessing officials, the department of local government finance, and the
legislative services agency for the purposes established in
IC 6-1.1-4-13.6, sales ratio studies, equalization, adoption of rules
under IC 6-1.1-31-3 and IC 6-1.1-31-6, and any other authorized
purpose.
(d) In a county containing a consolidated city, the auditor shall
review each sales disclosure form and process any deduction for which
the form serves as an application under IC 6-1.1-12-44. The auditor
shall forward the sales disclosure form to the appropriate township
assessor (if any). The township assessor shall verify the assessed
valuation of the property for the assessment date to which the
application applies and transmit that assessed valuation to the auditor.
The township or county assessor shall forward the sales disclosure form
to the department of local government finance in an electronic format
specified by the department of local government finance. The
department of local government finance shall make sales disclosure
form data received from a township or county assessor available to the
legislative services agency. The forms may be used by the county
assessing officials, the county auditor, the department of local
government finance, and the legislative services agency for the
purposes established in IC 6-1.1-4-13.6, sales ratio studies,
equalization, adoption of rules under IC 6-1.1-31-3 and IC 6-1.1-31-6,
and any other authorized purpose.
(e) This subsection applies if a sales disclosure form indicates
that the conveyance involves property that is registered under
IC 15-11-16 as a Hoosier homestead. The county assessor or
township assessor (if any) shall forward the sales disclosure form
to the Indiana state department of agriculture not later than ten
(10) days after receipt of the form. The Indiana state department
of agriculture may use the forms to maintain the information in the
Hoosier homestead registry.
(e) (f) If a sales disclosure form includes the telephone number or
Social Security number of a party, the telephone number or Social
Security number is confidential.
(f) (g) County assessing officials, county auditors, and other local
officials may not establish procedures or requirements concerning sales
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


disclosure forms that substantially differ from the procedures and
requirements of this chapter.
(g) (h) Except as provided in subsection (h), (i), a separate sales
disclosure form is required for each parcel conveyed, regardless of
whether more than one (1) parcel is conveyed under a single
conveyance document.
(h) (i) Only one (1) sales disclosure form is required for the
conveyance under a single conveyance document of two (2) or more
contiguous parcels located entirely within a single taxing district.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-5.5-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.192-2021,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The department of local government finance
shall prescribe a sales disclosure form for use under this chapter. The
form prescribed by the department of local government finance must
include at least the following information:
(1) The key number (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-8.5) of each parcel.
(2) With respect to each parcel, whether the entire parcel is being
conveyed.
(3) The address of each improved parcel.
(4) The date of the execution of the form.
(5) The date the property was transferred.
(6) Whether the transfer includes an interest in land or
improvements, or both.
(7) Whether the transfer includes personal property.
(8) An estimate of the value of any personal property included in
the transfer.
(9) The name, address, and telephone number of:
(A) each transferor and transferee; and
(B) the person that prepared the form.
(10) The mailing address to which the property tax bills or other
official correspondence should be sent.
(11) The ownership interest transferred.
(12) The classification of the property (as residential, commercial,
industrial, agricultural, vacant land, or other).
(13) Subject to subsection (c), the total price actually paid or
required to be paid in exchange for the conveyance, whether in
terms of money, property, a service, an agreement, or other
consideration, but excluding tax payments and payments for legal
and other services that are incidental to the conveyance.
(14) The terms of seller provided financing.
(15) Any family or business relationship existing between the
transferor and the transferee.
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


(16) If the property being conveyed is registered as a Hoosier
homestead (as defined in IC 15-11-16-3) the following
information:
(A) The familial relationship (if any) between the
transferor and transferee (parent, spouse, sibling, cousin,
nephew, niece, aunt, or uncle).
(B) The number of acres of the parcel (if any) that were
owned by the transferor's first family member (as defined
in IC 15-11-16-2).
(16) (17) A legal description of each parcel subject to the
conveyance.
(17) (18) Whether the transferee is using the form to claim one (1)
or more deductions under IC 6-1.1-12-44 for property taxes first
due and payable in a calendar year after 2008.
(18) (19) If the transferee uses the form to claim the standard
deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37, the information required for a
standard deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(19) (20) Sufficient instructions and information to permit a party
to terminate a standard deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37 on any
parcel of property on which the party or the spouse of the party
will no longer be eligible for the standard deduction under
IC 6-1.1-12-37 after the party or the party's spouse begins to
reside at the property that is the subject of the sales disclosure
form, including an explanation of the tax consequences and
applicable penalties if a party unlawfully claims a standard
deduction under IC 6-1.1-12-37.
(20) (21) Other information as required by the department of local
government finance to carry out this chapter.
(21) (22) For transactions occurring after December 31, 2021,
information required under IC 6-1.1-10-21(e) demonstrating proof
of nonprofit status.
If a form under this section includes the telephone number or part or all
of the Social Security number of a party, the telephone number or the
Social Security number is confidential.
(b) The instructions for completing the form described in subsection
(a) must include the information described in IC 6-1.1-12-43(c)(1).
(c) If the conveyance includes more than one (1) parcel as described
in section 3(h) 3(i) of this chapter, the form:
(1) is not required to include the price referred to in subsection
(a)(13) for each of the parcels subject to the conveyance; and
(2) may state a single combined price for all of those parcels.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-5.5-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2008,
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The county auditor may not accept a
conveyance document if:
(1) the sales disclosure form signed by all the parties and attested
as required under section 9 of this chapter is not included with the
document; or
(2) the sales disclosure form does not contain the information
required by section 5(a)(1) through 5(a)(16) 5(a)(17) of this
chapter as that section applies to the conveyance, subject to the
obligation of a party to furnish or correct the information in the
manner required by and subject to the penalty provisions of
section 12 of this chapter.
(b) The county recorder shall not record a conveyance document
without evidence that the parties have filed with the county auditor a
sales disclosure form approved by the county assessor as eligible for
filing under section 3(b)(2) of this chapter.
SECTION 4. IC 15-11-16 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 16. Hoosier Homesteads
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "farm" means an area of real
property that:
(1) is assessed as agricultural property under rules adopted by
the department of local government finance; and
(2) may also include adjoining real property upon which is
located a dwelling and any closely associated buildings and
structures.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "first family member" means the
original member of the owner's family who owned property that is
part of a Hoosier homestead.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "Hoosier homestead" means any
portion of a farm:
(1) that the department determines meets the requirements
under section 8 of this chapter;
(2) that is entered into the registry under section 11 of this
chapter; and
(3) for which the registration is not expired or revoked under
this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "owner" means a person:
(1) listed on the tax assessment rolls as being responsible for
the payment of real estate taxes imposed on the property; and
(2) in whose name title to real estate is shown in the records
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


of the recorder of the county in which the real estate is
located.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "program" means the Hoosier
homestead program established by this chapter.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "registry" means the Hoosier
homestead registry established under this chapter.
Sec. 7. (a) The Hoosier homestead program is established for the
following purposes:
(1) To honor Indiana's rich agricultural heritage by
recognizing:
(A) family farms that have been owned continuously by the
same family for at least one hundred (100) years; and
(B) the contributions these family farms have made to the
economic, cultural, and social advancements of Indiana.
(2) To promote preservation of Indiana's historic family
farms by maintaining a registry that provides notice to an
entity with eminent domain authority that:
(A) a property proposed for acquisition is a Hoosier
homestead; and
(B) the entity must comply with IC 32-24-1.5 before
proceeding with condemnation.
(b) The department shall administer the program.
Sec. 8. (a) Any portion of a farm may be eligible for a Hoosier
homestead designation, if the property meets the following
requirements:
(1) The property has been under the continuous ownership of
the same family for at least one hundred (100) years. The line
of ownership from the first family member that owned the
property to the current owner may only be through spouses,
children, siblings, nephews, nieces, aunts, uncles, or cousins.
Legally adopted family members are recognized equally with
blood relatives.
(2) The property is used for agricultural purposes, which
includes contracting with a nonfamily member to farm the
land.
(3) At least:
(A) twenty (20) acres of property used for agricultural
purposes was owned by the first family member; or
(B) one (1) acre of property used for agricultural purposes
was owned by the first family member and produces a
gross of at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) of
agricultural products (as defined in IC 15-12-1-3) a year.
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


(4) All property taxes under IC 6-1.1 have been paid up to
date.
(b) Only the portion of the farm that meets the requirements
under subsection (a):
(1) constitutes a Hoosier homestead; and
(2) is subject to the provisions of IC 32-24-1.5, if condemned.
Sec. 9. An owner must submit an application for registration to
the department on a form established by the department. The
application must include the following:
(1) Information and documentation of the unbroken familial
line of ownership of the farm, from the first family member
and through all successive family member owners to the
current owner. Copies of any of the following may be
submitted with the application to document the transfer of
ownership and the familial relationship of the owners:
(A) An original deed, land patent, or other instrument.
(B) Records maintained in a courthouse.
(C) An abstract of title covering the real estate.
(2) Information regarding the familial relationship of each
previous owner to the current owner.
(3) If the property is in a trust or in the name of a
corporation, proof must be submitted that the farm remains
in the family by submitting a copy of:
(A) the articles of incorporation showing that only family
members are members of the corporation; or
(B) the trust document showing that only family members
are trust beneficiaries.
(4) Documentation required by the department showing that
the property taxes are paid up to date.
(5) Any other information or documentation required by the
department.
Sec. 10. An owner shall certify on an application to the accuracy
of the information provided.
Sec. 11. (a) If the department determines that the property
satisfies the requirements for registration as a Hoosier homestead,
the department shall do the following:
(1) Enter the property on the registry as a Hoosier homestead.
(2) Issue to the applicant a certificate and yard sign
commemorating the farm as a Hoosier homestead.
(3) Provide the applicant with a notice under section 18 of this
chapter.
(b) The certificate and yard sign issued by the department may
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


commemorate different categories of continuous familial
ownership as follows:
(1) A centennial designation, if the family has owned a farm
for at least one hundred (100) years and less than one
hundred fifty (150) years.
(2) A sesquicentennial designation, if the family has owned a
farm for at least one hundred fifty (150) years and less than
two hundred (200) years.
(3) A bicentennial designation, if the family has owned a farm
for at least two hundred (200) years.
Sec. 12. The department shall establish a registry not later than
January 1, 2027.
Sec. 13. The registry must:
(1) be maintained in an electronic format;
(2) permit electronic submission of registration renewals;
(3) include the registration's expiration date; and
(4) be accessible to the public through the computer gateway
administered by the office of technology established by
IC 4-13.1-2-1.
Sec. 14. (a) To maintain a farm's registration as a Hoosier
homestead:
(1) the requirements under section 8 of this chapter for
eligibility must continue to be met; and
(2) the farm's registration must be renewed biennially by
submitting a renewal application to the department.
(b) If a farm's registration is expired or revoked, the provisions
of IC 32-24-1.5 do not apply to the farm.
Sec. 15. (a) If any part of a Hoosier homestead is transferred,
including a transfer to a family member, the registration must be
renewed and the registry updated.
(b) The department shall receive from a county assessor or
township assessor (if any) a sales disclosure form for each
conveyance of all or part of a Hoosier homestead under
IC 6-1.1-5.5-5. The department shall send a notice to the transferee
that for the farm to remain in good standing and maintain
designation as a Hoosier homestead, the registration must be
renewed by submitting a renewal form to the department not later
than sixty (60) days after the date of the notice. The department
may require further documentation as proof that the property still
satisfies the requirements for a Hoosier homestead.
(c) The registry must be updated to reflect that a registration is:
(1) revoked, if the department determines that a property
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


transfer results in the farm no longer meeting the eligibility
requirements of section 8 of this chapter; or
(2) expired because the registration was not renewed and
updated.
Sec. 16. The department may not charge a fee for the
registration of a farm as a Hoosier homestead or the renewal of a
registration.
Sec. 17. The department shall post information on its website
concerning the necessity of maintaining a Hoosier homestead
registration in good standing for the provisions of IC 32-24-1.5 to
apply.
Sec. 18. (a) The department shall issue to an owner that receives
a Hoosier homestead designation a notice, certified by the
department, that provides the following information:
(1) The name of the property owner.
(2) The address or description of the property that received
the Hoosier homestead designation.
(3) The statement that the owner's property or a portion of
the property was designated a Hoosier homestead by the
department on the specified date.
(b) The notice shall also provide the following information:
(1) A Hoosier homestead designation may expire or be
revoked. The department and the department's online
registry can provide information regarding the current status
of the Hoosier homestead designation.
(2) The contact information for the department and address
for the registry website.
(c) The recorder shall charge a fee for recording the document
in accordance with IC 36-2-7-10.
(d) Nothing in this chapter requires an owner to record a notice
to:
(1) maintain Hoosier homestead status; or
(2) be subject to the provisions set forth in IC 32-24-1.5.
SECTION 5. IC 32-24-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.84-2016,
SECTION 143, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Any person that may exercise
the power of eminent domain for any public use under any statute may
exercise the power only in the manner provided in this article, except
as otherwise provided by law.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (g), before proceeding to
condemn, the person:
(1) may enter upon any land to examine and survey the property
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


sought to be acquired; and
(2) must make an effort to purchase for the use intended the land,
right-of-way, easement, or other interest, in the property; and
(3) must first comply with IC 32-24-1.5 before making an
effort to purchase a fee simple interest in the property under
subdivision (2), if the condemnor is a county, city, town, or
school corporation and the property is a registered Hoosier
homestead under IC 15-11-16.
(c) The effort to purchase under subsection (b)(2) must include the
following:
(1) Establishing a proposed purchase price for the property.
(2) Providing the owner of the property with an appraisal or other
evidence used to establish the proposed purchase price.
(3) Conducting good faith negotiations with the owner of the
property.
(d) If the land or interest in the land, or property or right is owned
by a person who is an incapacitated person (as defined in
IC 29-3-1-7.5) or less than eighteen (18) years of age, the person
seeking to acquire the property may purchase the property from the
guardian of the incapacitated person or person less than eighteen (18)
years of age. If the purchase is approved by the court appointing the
guardian and the approval is written upon the face of the deed, the
conveyance of the property purchased and the deed made and approved
by the court are valid and binding upon the incapacitated person or
persons less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(e) The deed given, when executed instead of condemnation,
conveys only the interest stated in the deed.
(f) If property is taken by proceedings under this article, the entire
fee simple title may be taken and acquired.
(g) This subsection applies to a public utility (as defined in
IC 32-24-1-5.9(a)) section 5.9(a) of this chapter) or a pipeline
company (as defined in IC 8-1-22.6-7). If a public utility or a pipeline
company seeks to acquire land or an interest in land under this article,
the public utility or pipeline company may not enter upon the land to
examine or survey the property sought to be acquired unless either of
the following occur:
(1) The public utility or the pipeline company sends notice by
certified mail to the affected landowner (as defined in
IC 8-1-22.6-2) of the public utility's or the pipeline company's
intention to enter upon the landowner's property for survey
purposes. The notice required by this subdivision must be mailed
not later than fourteen (14) days before the date of the public
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


utility's or the pipeline company's proposed examination or
survey.
(2) The public utility or the pipeline company receives the
landowner's signed consent to enter the property to perform the
proposed examination or survey.
An affected landowner may bring an action to enforce this subsection
in the circuit court, superior court, or probate court of the county in
which the landowner's property is located. A prevailing landowner is
entitled to the landowner's actual damages as a result of the public
utility's or the pipeline company's violation. In addition, the court may
award a prevailing landowner reasonable costs of the action and
attorney's fees.
SECTION 6. IC 32-24-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.80-2020,
SECTION 3, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) A defendant may object to the proceedings:
(1) because the court does not have jurisdiction either of the
subject matter or of the person;
(2) because the plaintiff does not have the right to exercise the
power of eminent domain for the use sought; or
(3) because the property is registered as a Hoosier homestead
under IC 15-11-16 and the requirements of IC 32-24-1.5 were
not satisfied; or
(3) (4) for any other reason disclosed in the complaint or set up in
the objections.
(b) Objections under subsection (a) must be:
(1) in writing;
(2) separately stated and numbered; and
(3) filed not later than thirty (30) days after the date the notice
required in section 6 of this chapter is served on the defendant.
However, the court may extend the period for filing objections by
not more than thirty (30) days upon written motion of the
defendant.
(c) The court may not allow pleadings in the cause other than the
complaint, any objections, and the written exceptions provided for in
section 11 of this chapter. However, the court may permit amendments
to the pleadings.
(d) If an objection is sustained, the plaintiff may amend the
complaint or may appeal from the decision in the manner that appeals
are taken from final judgments in civil actions. All the parties shall take
notice and are bound by the judgment in an appeal.
(e) If the objections are overruled, the court shall appoint appraisers
as provided for in this chapter. Any defendant may appeal the
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


interlocutory order overruling the objections and appointing appraisers
in the manner that appeals are taken from final judgments in civil
actions.
(f) All the parties shall take notice of and be bound by the judgment
in the appeal.
(g) The transcript must be filed in the office of the clerk of the
supreme court not later than thirty (30) days after the notice of the
defendant's appeal is filed. The appeal does not stay proceedings in the
cause.
(h) This subsection does not apply to a condemnation action brought
by a public utility (as defined in section 5.9(a) of this chapter) or by a
pipeline company. Notwithstanding section 14 of this chapter, if an
objection:
(1) is sustained, and no appeal is filed; or
(2) is sustained in the judgment in the appeal;
the court shall award the defendant the reasonable costs and attorney's
fees incurred for the objection, in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000).
SECTION 7. IC 32-24-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 1.5. Condemnation of a Hoosier Homestead
Sec. 1. This chapter only applies to a unit that exercises the
unit's eminent domain authority to acquire a fee simple interest in
Hoosier homestead property.
Sec. 2. This chapter does not apply to a unit that exercises the
unit's eminent domain powers to acquire a fee simple interest in
Hoosier homestead property, if the acquisition is part of a project
administered by the Indiana department of transportation.
Sec. 3. This chapter only applies to an exercise of eminent
domain under:
(1) any statute (excluding IC 32-24-2) for which a written
acquisition offer for the property is rejected by the owner
after June 30, 2026; or
(2) IC 32-24-2, for which the works board adopts a resolution
under IC 32-24-2-6 after June 30, 2026.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "farm" has the meaning set forth
in IC 15-11-16-1.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "governing body" means the:
(1) legislative body (as defined in IC 36-1-2-9) of a unit; or
(2) governing body of a school corporation (as defined in
IC 20-18-2-5).
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "Hoosier homestead" means any
portion of a farm that satisfies both of the following:
(1) The property is registered as a Hoosier homestead under
IC 15-11-16-11.
(2) The registration under subdivision (1) is not expired or
revoked as provided in IC 15-11-16-14.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "owner" means a person who
owns property that is registered as a Hoosier homestead, as
evidenced by both of the following:
(1) The person is listed on the tax assessment rolls as
responsible for the payment of real estate taxes imposed on
the property.
(2) The person's name is shown on the title to the real estate
in the records of the recorder of the county in which the real
estate is located.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "relocation costs" means
relocation expenses payable in accordance with the federal
Uniform Relocation Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. 4601 through 42
U.S.C. 4655).
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "school corporation" means a
school corporation (as defined in IC 20-18-2-16) that is expressly
authorized by statute to exercise the power of eminent domain.
Sec. 10. As used in this chapter, "unit" means a county, city,
town, or school corporation.
Sec. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, a condemnor may not
file a complaint in condemnation or a works board may not hear
remonstrances under IC 32-24-2-6 unless the requirements of this
chapter are satisfied.
Sec. 12. (a) This section applies only to an acquisition of
property under section 3(1) of this chapter.
(b) A condemnor shall send notice of an owner's rejection of a
written acquisition offer for the property:
(1) not later than ten (10) days after the date the owner's
rejection is received; and
(2) to the governing body of the unit that is condemning the
property.
Sec. 13. (a) This section only applies to an acquisition of
property by a unit under section 3(2) of this chapter.
(b) A works board of a unit condemning the property shall send
notice of the adoption of the resolution under IC 32-24-2-6:
(1) not later than ten (10) days after the date the resolution is
adopted; and
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


(2) to the governing body of the unit condemning the
property;
at the same time notice of the resolution is sent to affected persons.
Sec. 14. After receiving notice under section 12 or 13 of this
chapter, the governing body shall:
(1) place the condemnation of property that is the subject of
the notice on the governing body's meeting agenda not earlier
than thirty (30) days or later than sixty (60) days after
receiving the notice regarding the property; and
(2) provide notice by first class mail:
(A) of the purpose, place, date, and time of the meeting;
and
(B) at least thirty (30) days before the date of meeting;
to each owner of property that is the subject of the notice
received under section 12 or 13 of this chapter.
Sec. 15. Any owner receiving notice under section 13 of this
chapter is entitled to provide oral or written testimony at the
public meeting regarding any matter pertaining to:
(1) the proposed acquisition of the owner's property;
(2) the purpose for which condemnation of the owner's
property is sought; or
(3) any other matter pertaining to the owner's property.
Sec. 16. Upon conclusion of the meeting of the governing body,
the requirements of this chapter are satisfied and the
condemnation may proceed.
Sec. 17. Notwithstanding IC 32-24-1, a condemnor that acquires
a Hoosier homestead property through the exercise of eminent
domain under this chapter shall compensate the owner for the
greater of the following:
(1) An amount equal to:
(A) two hundred percent (200%) of the fair market value
of the parcel as determined under IC 32-24-1;
(B) any other damages determined under IC 32-24-1 and
any loss incurred in a trade or business that is attributable
to the exercise of eminent domain; and
(C) the owner's relocation costs, if any.
(2) An amount equal to:
(A) two hundred percent (200%) of the estimated:
(i) value of the land; and
(ii) replacement cost of buildings and land improvements
as of the date of valuation, minus the losses in value that
have taken place due to wear and tear, design and plan,
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


or neighborhood influences;
(B) any other damages determined under IC 32-24-1 and
any loss incurred in a trade or business that is attributable
to the exercise of eminent domain; and
(C) the owner's relocation costs, if any.
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Agriculture and Rural
Development, to which was referred House Bill 1105, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1105 as introduced.)
AYLESWORTH
Committee Vote: Yeas 11, Nays 0
HB 1105—LS 6451/DI 87